Utah statutes.
17-15-20.   Disposition of coal land revenue.

Eighty per centum of all money received by the state of Utah from the treasurer of the United States, as bonuses, royalties, and rentals upon United States coal lands located in this state shall be allocated to the county or counties out of or from which is taken the coal from which such bonuses, royalties, and rentals are derived; provided, that such sum or sums so received shall be paid over to such county or counties for the construction and maintenance of roads and for the support and maintenance of public schools of such county or counties and no other.



No Change Since 1953

